California statutes. Public Resources Code
(d) “Postconsumer recycled material” means a material that would otherwise be destined for solid waste disposal, having completed its intended end use and product life cycle. Postconsumer recycled material does not include materials and byproducts generated from, and commonly reused within, an original manufacturing and fabrication process.

(e) “Recycled paper bag” means a paper carryout bag provided by a store to a customer at the point of sale that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is accepted for recycling in curbside programs in a majority of
 households that have access to curbside recycling programs in the state.

(2) Has printed on the bag the name of the manufacturer, the country where the bag was manufactured, and the percentage of postconsumer content.

(3) (A) Contains a minimum of 50 percent postconsumer recycled materials.

(B) The requirement in subparagraph (A) applies on and after January 1, 2028.

(f) “Store” means a retail establishment that meets any of the following requirements:

(1) A full-line, self-service retail store with gross annual sales of two million dollars ($2,000,000) or more that
 sells a line of dry groceries, canned goods, or nonfood items, and some perishable items.

(2) Has at least 10,000 square feet of retail space that generates sales or use tax pursuant to the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) and has a pharmacy licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 4000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) Is a convenience food store, foodmart, or other entity that is engaged in the retail sale of a limited line of goods, generally including milk, bread, soda, and snack foods, and that holds a Type 20 or Type 21 license issued by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

(4) Is a convenience food store, foodmart, or other entity that is engaged in the retail sale of goods intended to be consumed off the premises, and that holds a Type 20 or Type 21 license issued by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

(5) If not otherwise subject to paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4), if the retail establishment voluntarily agrees to comply with the requirements imposed upon a store pursuant to this chapter, irrevocably notifies the department of its intent to comply with the requirements imposed upon a store pursuant to this chapter, and complies with the requirements established pursuant to Section 42284. 

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 453, Sec. 4.   (SB 1053)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Reusable Grocery Bags [42281.2. - 42281.2.]

42281.2.

(a) On and after January 1, 2025, a store, as defined in Section 42280, shall not provide a precheckout bag to a customer if the bag is not one of the following:

(1) A compostable bag that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Complies with the standards described in Section 42357.5.

(B) Is eligible to be labeled with the terms “compostable” or “home compostable” pursuant to Section 42357.

(C) Has a minimum 15-inch mouth width.

(2) A recycled paper bag.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “precheckout bag” means a bag provided to a customer before the customer reaches the point of sale, that is designed to protect a purchased item from damaging or contaminating other purchased items in a checkout bag, or to contain an unwrapped food item, such as, but not limited to, loose produce, meat or fish, nuts, grains, candy, and bakery goods. “Precheckout bag” does not include a bag used to prepackage items prior to their arrival in a store.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 991, Sec. 1.   (SB 1046)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Single-Use Carryout Bags [42283. - 42284.]

42283.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), a store shall not provide, distribute, or sell a carryout bag at the point of sale.

(b) (1) A store may make available for purchase at the point of sale a recycled paper bag but shall not sell a recycled paper bag for less than ten cents ($0.10) in order to ensure that the cost of providing a recycled paper bag is not subsidized by a consumer who does not require that bag.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a store that makes recycled paper bags available for purchase at the point of sale shall provide a recycled paper bag at no cost at the point of sale to a customer using a payment card or voucher issued by the California
 Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 123275) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code or an electronic benefit transfer card issued pursuant to Section 10072 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) A store may provide at the point of sale a carryout bag that meets the requirements of subparagraph (A), (B), or (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42280.

(d) A store shall not require a customer to use, purchase, or accept a recycled paper bag or a compostable bag as a condition of sale of any product.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 453, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 168.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

42283.5.

(a) A store, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (f) of Section 42280, shall comply with the same requirements of Section 42283 that are imposed upon a store, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (f) of Section 42280.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 453, Sec. 12.   (SB 1053)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

42283.7.

All moneys collected pursuant to this article shall be retained by the store and may be used only for the following purposes:

(a) Costs associated with complying with the requirements of this article.

(b) Actual costs of providing recycled paper bags or reusable grocery bags.

(c) Costs associated with a store’s educational materials or educational campaign encouraging the use of reusable grocery bags.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 850, Sec. 1.   (SB 270)   Effective date postponed (until November 9, 2016) by referendum petition.   Approved in referendum Proposition 67 at the November 8, 2016, election.)
-------------------------------------------

42284.

(a) A retail establishment not specifically required to comply with the requirements of this chapter is encouraged to reduce its distribution of carryout bags.

(b) Pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (5) of subdivision (f) of Section 42280, any retail establishment that is not a “store,” that provides the department with the irrevocable written notice as specified in subdivision (c), shall be regulated as a “store” for the purposes of this chapter.

(c) The irrevocable written notice shall be dated and signed by an authorized representative of the retail establishment, and shall include the name and
 physical address of all retail locations covered by the notice. The department shall acknowledge receipt of the notice in writing and shall specify the date the retail establishment will be regulated as a “store,” which shall not be less than 30 days after the date of the department’s acknowledgment. The department shall post on its internet website, organized by county, the name and physical location or locations of each retail establishment that has elected to be regulated as a “store.”

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 453, Sec. 15.   (SB 1053)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Enforcement [42285. - 42285.]

42285.

(a) A city, a county, a city and county, or the state may impose civil liability on a person or entity that knowingly violated this chapter, or reasonably should have known that it violated this chapter, in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for the first violation of this chapter, two thousand dollars ($2,000) per day for the second violation, and five thousand dollars ($5,000) per day for the third and subsequent violations.

(b) Any civil penalties collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be paid to the office of the city attorney, city prosecutor, district attorney, or Attorney General, whichever office brought the action. The penalties collected
 pursuant to this section by the Attorney General may be expended by the Attorney General, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to enforce this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 850, Sec. 1.   (SB 270)   Effective date postponed (until November 9, 2016) by referendum petition.   Approved in referendum Proposition 67 at the November 8, 2016, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Preemption [42287. - 42287.]

42287.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), this chapter is a matter of statewide interest and concern and is applicable uniformly throughout the state. Accordingly, this chapter occupies the whole field of regulation of reusable grocery bags, single-use carryout bags, and recycled paper bags, as defined in this chapter, provided by a store, as defined in this chapter.

(b) On and after January 1, 2015, a city, county, or other local public agency shall not enforce, or otherwise implement, an ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule, or any amendment thereto, adopted on or after September 1, 2014, relating to reusable grocery bags, single-use carryout bags, or recycled
 paper bags, against a store, as defined in this chapter, unless expressly
 authorized by this chapter.

(c) (1) A city, county, or other local public agency that has adopted, before September 1, 2014, an ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule relating to reusable grocery bags, single-use carryout bags, or recycled paper bags may continue to enforce and implement that ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule that was in effect before that date. Any amendments to that ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule on or after January 1, 2015, shall be subject to subdivision (b), except the city, county, or other local public agency may adopt or amend an ordinance, resolution, regulation, or rule to increase the amount that a store shall charge with regard to a recycled paper bag, compostable bag, or reusable grocery bag to no less than the amount specified in Section 42283. 

(2) A city, county, or other local public agency not covered by paragraph (1) that, before September 1, 2014, has passed a first reading of an ordinance or resolution expressing the intent to restrict single-use carryout bags and, before January 1, 2015, adopts an ordinance to restrict single-use carryout bags, may continue to enforce and implement the ordinance that was in effect before January 1, 2015.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 850, Sec. 1.   (SB 270)   Effective date postponed (until November 9, 2016) by referendum petition.   Approved in referendum Proposition 67 at the November 8, 2016, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Financial Provisions [42288. - 42288.]

42288.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 42023.2, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Subaccount in the Integrated Waste Management Account to the department for the purposes of providing loans for the creation and retention of jobs and economic activity in this state for the manufacture and recycling of plastic reusable grocery bags that use recycled content, including postconsumer recycled material.

(b) The department may expend, if there are applicants eligible for funding from the Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Subaccount, the funds appropriated pursuant to this
 section to provide loans for both of the following:

(1) Development and conversion of machinery and facilities for the manufacture of single-use plastic bags into machinery and facilities for the manufacturer of durable reusable grocery bags that, at a minimum, meet the requirements of Section 42281.

(2) Development of equipment for the manufacture of reusable grocery bags, that, at a minimum, meet the requirements of Section 42281.

(c) A recipient of a loan authorized by this section shall agree, as a condition of receiving the loan, to retain and retrain existing employees for the manufacturing of reusable grocery bags that, at a minimum, meet the requirements of Section 42281.

(d) Any moneys appropriated pursuant to this section not expended by the end of the 2015–16 fiscal year shall revert to the Recycling Market Development Revolving Loan Subaccount for expenditure pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42010) of Chapter 1.

(e) Applicants for funding under this section may also apply for funding or benefits from other economic development programs for which they may be eligible, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(1) An income tax credit, as described in Sections 17059.2 and 23689 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) A tax exemption pursuant to Section 6377.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 850, Sec. 1.   (SB 270)   Effective date for subdivisions (b) through (e) postponed (until November 9, 2016) by referendum petition.   Approved in referendum Proposition 67 at the November 8, 2016, election.   Note: Subdivision (a) was not subject to the referendum and took effect on January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.4. Plastic Trash Bags [42290. - 42298.]

42290.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meaning:

(a) “Manufacturer” means a person who manufactures plastic trash bags for sale in this state.

(b) (1) “Plastic trash bag” means a bag that is manufactured for intended use as a container to hold, store, or transport materials to be discarded, composted, or recycled, including, but not limited to, garbage bags, composting bags, lawn and leaf bags, can-liner bags, kitchen bags, compactor bags, and recycling bags.

(2) A plastic trash bag does not include a grocery sack or any other bag that is manufactured for intended use as a container to hold, store, or transport food.

(3) A plastic trash bag does not include any plastic bag that is used for the purpose of containing either of the following wastes:

(A) “Hazardous waste,” as defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) “Medical waste,” as defined in Section 117690 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Postconsumer material” means a finished product that would normally be disposed of as solid waste, having completed its intended end-use and product life cycle. “Postconsumer material” does not include manufacturing and fabrication scrap.

(d) “Regulated bag” means a plastic trash bag of 0.70 mil or greater thickness that is intended for sale in the state.

(e) “Wholesaler” means any person who purchases plastic trash bags from a manufacturer for resale in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 44, Sec. 1.   Effective May 22, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

42290.5.

To encourage waste diversion of polyethylene from California landfills as well as to encourage California’s postconsumer market development, it is the intent of the Legislature that any certification of postconsumer materials used for compliance with this chapter not be the same materials that are certified or used for compliance with any other state requirement or with any federal requirement that requires the use or reporting of postconsumer materials for plastic products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 44, Sec. 2.   Effective May 22, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

42291.

(a) Until January 1, 1998, every manufacturer that manufactures plastic trash bags of 0.75 mil or greater thickness for sale in this state shall ensure that at least 30 percent of the material used in those plastic trash bags is recycled plastic postconsumer material.

(b) (1) On and after January 1, 1998, the manufacturer’s required use of recycled plastic postconsumer material shall be determined pursuant to paragraph (2). Compliance by a manufacturer with either alternative shall be deemed to be compliance with this subdivision.

(2) Every manufacturer of regulated bags shall do one of the following:

(A) Ensure that its plastic trash bags intended for sale in this state contain a quantity of recycled plastic postconsumer material equal to at least 10 percent of the weight of the regulated bags.

(B) Ensure that at least 30 percent of the weight of the material used in all of its plastic products intended for sale in this state is recycled plastic postconsumer material.

(3) Beginning March 1, 1999, and annually thereafter, every manufacturer subject to this subdivision shall certify to the board that it has used the required amount of recycled plastic postconsumer material annually in compliance with paragraph (2).

(c) Any certification of postconsumer materials used for compliance with this chapter shall not include any materials that are certified or used for compliance with any other state or federal requirement that requires the use or reporting of postconsumer materials for any plastic products.

(d) If any manufacturer subject to this section is unable to obtain sufficient amounts of recycled plastic postconsumer material to comply with this section within a reporting period because of unavailability or because the available material did not meet recycled plastic postconsumer material quality standards adopted by the board, the manufacturer shall certify that fact to the board. Each manufacturer making that certification shall make a reasonable effort to identify available supplies of material before submitting certification to the board.

(e) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that although the changes made to this section by the act amending this section during the 1998 portion of the 1997–98 Regular Session become effective after January 1, 1998, it is the intent of the Legislature that the new requirements specified in subdivision (b) be effective as of January 1, 1998. The Legislature further finds that this change is requested by the manufacturers subject to this section and that the retroactive effect of these changes will not cause any hardship on any manufacturer subject to this section, or cause any manufacturer to be subject to regulatory action as a result of these changes, but rather, would instead have the effect of preventing hardship to the manufacturers regulated by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 44, Sec. 3.   Effective May 22, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

42291.5.

For each pound of recycled plastic postconsumer material purchased from a source of recycled plastic postconsumer material in this state for use in the manufacture of plastic trash bags, or other products manufactured with recycled plastic postconsumer material in compliance with this chapter, the board shall credit the manufacturer certifying pursuant to Section 42293 with having used 1.2 pounds of recycled plastic postconsumer material toward compliance with the requirements of Section 42291.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 406, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

42292.

Each manufacturer shall obtain from its suppliers of recycled plastic postconsumer material for use in the manufacture of plastic trash bags, or other products manufactured with recycled plastic postconsumer material in compliance with this chapter, a statement identifying the quantity, source location, and proximate prior usage of, and the actual postconsumer material content of, each shipment of recycled plastic postconsumer material purchased by the manufacturer, and any other information that the board, may, by regulation, require the manufacturer to obtain from its suppliers, for purposes of inclusion in the annual report required by Section 42293.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 44, Sec. 5.   Effective May 22, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

42293.

(a) On or before March 1, 1999, and annually thereafter, each manufacturer subject to this chapter shall submit a report to the board certifying that it has complied with Section 42291 during the preceding calendar year, certifying the name and physical location of each of its suppliers of recycled plastic postconsumer material for use in the manufacture of plastic trash bags, or other products manufactured with recycled plastic postconsumer material in compliance with this chapter, and containing the information obtained pursuant to Section 42292 and any other information that the board may require by regulation. Any manufacturer that processes its own recycled plastic postconsumer material shall certify to the board that it is the supplier of the material.

(b) On or before October 1, 2001, the board shall survey manufacturers subject to this section and, notwithstanding Section 7550.5 of the Government Code, report back to the Legislature. The survey shall do all of the following:

(1) Identify the name and physical location of suppliers certified by manufacturers pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) Identify the quantity of recycled plastic postconsumer material provided by suppliers within the state and the quantity of the material provided by suppliers outside the state.

(3) Provide recommendations regarding recycled plastic postconsumer material content requirements based on the availability of that material.

(4) Identify gauge thickness of all regulated bags.

(5) Determine national production versus production of a separate line for California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 44, Sec. 6.   Effective May 22, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

42294.

(a) Every wholesaler of plastic trash bags of 1.0 mil or greater thickness sold in this state shall certify to the board the name and physical location of each manufacturer from whom it purchased plastic trash bags for purposes of inclusion in the annual report required by subdivision (c).

(b) On and after January 1, 1995, every wholesaler of trash bags of 0.75 mil or greater thickness sold in this state shall certify to the board the name and physical location of each manufacturer from whom it purchased plastic trash bags for purposes of inclusion in the annual report required by subdivision (c).

(c) On or before March 1, 1994, and annually thereafter, each wholesaler shall submit a report to the board containing the certification required by this section for the preceding calendar year, together with any other information that the board may require by regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42295.

Each supplier, manufacturer, and wholesaler required to provide a certification or any information pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to audit by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42296.

(a) If any supplier provides a manufacturer with false or misleading information, the board, within 30 days of determining that fact, shall refer the false or misleading information to the Attorney General for prosecution for fraud.

(b) If any manufacturer or wholesaler provides the board with a false or misleading certification or other information, the board, within 30 days of determining that fact, shall refer the false or misleading certification or information to the Attorney General for prosecution for fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42297.

(a) The board may adopt such regulations as it determines are necessary to more specifically define terms for purposes of the chapter and to otherwise implement this chapter.

(b) Annually on or before July 1, the board shall publish a list of any suppliers, manufacturers, or wholesalers who have failed to comply with this chapter.

(c) (1) Any supplier, manufacturer, or wholesaler, and any of its divisions, subsidiaries, or successors, who fails to comply with this chapter, shall be ineligible for the award of any state contract or subcontract, or for the renewal, extension, or modification of an existing contract or subcontract, until the board determines that it is in compliance with this chapter.

(2) No state agency shall solicit offers from, award contracts to, or renew, extend, or modify a current contract or subcontract with, any supplier, manufacturer, or wholesaler, or any of its divisions, subsidiaries, or successors, who fails to comply with this chapter until the board determines that it is in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 44, Sec. 7.   Effective May 22, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

42298.

A plastic bag that is labeled with a term specified in subdivision (a) of Section 42357 and that meets the current ASTM standard specified for that term, as defined in Section 42356, is exempt from the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 143, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Plastic Packaging Containers [42300. - 42345.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Definitions [42300. - 42301.]

42300.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Recycling rigid plastic packaging containers saves landfill space, reduces energy consumption, and preserves natural resources.

(b) The California Integrated Waste Management Act of 1989 requires cities and counties to reduce the amount of waste disposed in landfills by 50 percent by the end of the decade through source reduction, recycling, and composting.

(c) Rigid plastic packaging containers represent a significant component of the solid waste generated in the state. 

(d) In order for recycling in the state to be successful, it is critical that stable, in-state markets be developed for material separately collected from the waste stream and processed for recycling.

(e) As of the effective date of this chapter, curbside collection of recyclables is available to nearly 20 percent of the state’s residents. In order to expand the variety of materials collected in these programs, including all rigid plastic packaging containers, it is essential that stable markets exist for the plastic materials collected. 

(f) The state has required several types of products to use increasing levels of postconsumer recycled material in their manufacture, including newsprint, glass containers, and plastic trash bags. 

(g) Some of the nation’s largest consumer product manufacturers have announced plans to require, or are currently requiring, their plastic packaging suppliers to provide them with containers comprised of increasing levels of postconsumer recycled materials, demonstrating that the technology is already available to use recycled material to make new plastic packaging containers. However, many businesses continue to purchase packaging materials made from 100 percent virgin plastic and to sell them in the state. 

(h) The food and consumer products industries are manufacturing safe products and packaging using plastic materials, some of which use less raw material than other packaging materials through source reduction and the reuse and recycling of used plastic materials.

(i) The Legislature recognizes that the need to reduce the amount of solid waste generated by food products must be balanced with the need to package those products so that they are resistant to tampering, damage, and spoilage.

(j) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to spur markets for plastic materials collected for recycling by requiring manufacturers to utilize increasing amounts of postconsumer recycled material in their rigid plastic packaging containers only if the use of that material does not present an unreasonable risk to the public health and safety, and to achieve high recycling rates for these rigid plastic packaging containers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1076, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

42301.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Container manufacturer” means a company or a successor company that sells any rigid plastic packaging container subject to this chapter to a manufacturer that sells or offers for sale in this state any product packaged in that container.

(b) “Curbside collection program” means a recycling program that collects materials set out by households for collection at the curb at intervals not less than every two weeks. “Curbside collection program” does not include redemption centers, buyback locations, drop-off programs, material recovery facilities, or plastic recovery facilities.

(c) “Refillable package” means a rigid plastic packaging container that the board determines is routinely returned to and refilled by the product manufacturer at least five times with the original product contained by the package.

(d) “Reusable package” means a rigid plastic packaging container that the board determines is routinely reused by consumers at least five times to store the original product contained by the package.

(e) “Manufacturer” means the producer or generator of a product that is sold or offered for sale in the state and that is stored inside of a rigid plastic packaging container.

(f) “Rigid plastic packaging container” means any plastic package having a relatively inflexible finite shape or form, with a minimum capacity of eight fluid ounces or its equivalent volume and a maximum capacity of five fluid gallons or its equivalent volume, that is capable of maintaining its shape while holding other products, including, but not limited to, bottles, cartons, and other receptacles, for sale or distribution in the state.

(g) “Postconsumer material” means a material that would otherwise be destined for solid waste disposal, having completed its intended end use and product lifecycle. Postconsumer material does not include materials and byproducts generated from, and commonly reused within, an original manufacturing and fabrication process.

(h) “Recycled” means a product or material that has been reused in the production of another product and has been diverted from disposal in a landfill.

(i) “Recycling rate” means the proportion, as measured by weight, volume, or number, of a rigid plastic packaging container sold or offered for sale in the state that is being recycled in a given calendar year, that is one of the following:

(1) A particular type of rigid plastic packaging container, such as a milk jug, soft drink container, or detergent bottle.

(2) A product-associated rigid plastic packaging container.

(3) A single resin type, as specified in Section 18015, of rigid plastic packaging container, notwithstanding the exemption of that container from this chapter pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 42340.

(j) (1) “Source reduced container” means either of the following:

(A) A rigid plastic packaging container for which the manufacturer seeks compliance as of January 1, 1995, whose package weight per unit or use of product has been reduced by 10 percent when compared with the packaging used for that product by the manufacturer from January 1, 1990, to December 31, 1994.

(B) A rigid plastic container for which the manufacturer seeks compliance after January 1, 1995, whose package weight per unit or use of product has been reduced by 10 percent when compared with one of the following:

(i) The packaging used for the product by the manufacturer on January 1, 1995.

(ii) The packaging used for that product by the manufacturer over the course of the first full year of commerce in this state.

(iii) The packaging used in commerce that same year for similar products whose containers have not been considered source reduced.

(2) A rigid plastic packaging container is not a source reduced container for the purposes of this chapter if the packaging reduction was achieved by any of the following:

(A) Substituting a different material type for a material that previously constituted the principal material of the container.

(B) Increasing a container’s weight per unit or use of product after January 1, 1991.

(C) Packaging changes that adversely affect the potential for the rigid plastic packaging container to be recycled or to be made of postconsumer material.

(k) “Product-associated rigid plastic packaging container” means a brand-specific, rigid plastic packaging line that may have one or more sizes, shapes, or designs and that is used in conjunction with a particular generic product line.

(l) “PETE” means polyethylene terephthalate as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 18015.

(m) “HDPE” means high-density polyethylene.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 666, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Manufacturing [42310. - 42310.3.]

42310.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, every rigid plastic packaging container sold or offered for sale in this state shall, on average, meet one of the following criteria:

(a) Be made from 25 percent postconsumer material.

(b) Have a recycling rate of 45 percent if it is a product-associated rigid plastic packaging container or a single resin type of rigid plastic packaging container, as demonstrated to the board by the product maker, container manufacturer, or other entity. The board may take appropriate action to verify the demonstration, but the board is not required to expend state funds to conduct a survey or calculate the rate.

(c) Be a reusable package or a refillable package.

(d) Be a source reduced container.

(e) Is a container containing floral preservative that is subsequently reused by the floral industry for at least two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 666, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

42310.1.

(a) Until January 1, 1997, the criteria specified in Section 42310 shall not apply to any rigid plastic packaging container that is manufactured for use with food or cosmetics, as defined in subdivisions (f) and (i) of Section 321 of Title 21 of the United States Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), rigid plastic packaging containers actually recycled shall be included in calculating the recycling rate pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 42310.

(c) Every manufacturer of a product packaged in a rigid plastic packaging container described in subdivision (a), which is not in compliance with Section 42310, that is exempt from the criteria specified in Section 42310 pursuant to subdivision (a), shall do both of the following:

(1) On or before December 1, 1995, the manufacturer shall submit a report to the board which demonstrates that the manufacturer is taking, and will continue to take, all feasible actions consistent with Section 42310 to ensure the reduction, recycling, or reuse of the rigid plastic packaging containers described in subdivision (a) and the development and expansion of markets for rigid plastic packaging containers. Those actions may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The use of postconsumer recycled plastic in rigid plastic packaging containers sold in this state.

(B) The use of postconsumer recycled plastic in other packaging materials sold or manufactured in this state.

(C) The use of postconsumer recycled plastic in other products sold or manufactured in this state.

(D) Arranging for the use of postconsumer recycled plastic collected for recycling in this state in the manufacture of nonrigid plastic packaging container products or packaging of another entity.

(E) The procurement of products containing postconsumer recycled plastic, including, but not limited to, trash bags, trash containers, pallets, carpeting, slip sheets, and shrink wrap.

(F) The demonstration of financial investment in recycled plastic collecting, processing, and remanufacturing activities in the state.

(2) On or before January 1, 1996, every manufacturer of rigid plastic packaging containers shall, for any rigid plastic packaging container that is exempt from, and not in compliance with, the criteria specified in Section 42310 pursuant to subdivision (a), diligently seek one or more “nonobjection letters” from the United States Food and Drug Administration which will permit the manufacturer of rigid plastic packaging containers to use recycled plastic in the manufacture of the rigid plastic packaging containers described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1227, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

42310.2.

(a) On or before July 1, 1994, as part of the regulations required to be adopted pursuant to Section 42325, the board shall adopt regulations to carry out the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 42310.1. In adopting regulations pursuant to this section, the board shall make every effort to limit paperwork and information to only those matters that are needed for the board to determine if manufacturers are taking all feasible actions to ensure the reduction, recycling, or reuse of the rigid plastic packaging containers described in subdivision (a) of Section 42310.1, and the development and expansion of markets for rigid plastic packaging containers.

(b) On or before February 1, 1996, the board shall review, and approve or disapprove, the reports required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 42310.1. If a report is not submitted pursuant to a schedule established by the board, or, if, based upon the report, the board determines that a manufacturer has not taken all feasible actions to ensure the reduction, recycling, or reuse of the containers and the development and expansion of markets for rigid plastic packaging containers, the board may take one of the following actions, as selected by the manufacturer:

(1) Require the manufacturer to take additional actions, including, but not limited to, one or more of the measures described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 42310.1, to ensure that the manufacturer is taking, and will continue to take, all feasible actions to ensure the reduction, recycling, or reuse of the containers and the development and expansion of markets for rigid plastic packaging containers.

(2) Impose a civil penalty of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) pursuant to Section 42322. In imposing monetary penalties pursuant to this paragraph, the board shall take into consideration all of the following factors:

(A) The size and net worth of the manufacturer.

(B) The impact of the violation on the overall objectives of this chapter.

(C) The severity of the violation. A penalty imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall not be required to be paid by a manufacturer before January 1, 1997.
